Maine, session 132, LD734.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4017 is enacted to read:
§4017. Voter registration; secondary schools
Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year and annually thereafter, a secondary school
shall organize and facilitate voter education and registration activities, including, but not
limited to, a voter registration drive in accordance with this section.
1. Voter registration drive coordinator. A secondary school shall designate a school
employee as a voter registration drive coordinator or invite a 3rd party, including, but not
limited to, an outside organization or a town clerk, to serve as a voter registration drive
coordinator that is responsible for organizing school voter education and voter registration
activities in accordance with this subsection.
A. The secondary school shall notify the Secretary of State of the name and title of the
person designated as a voter registration drive coordinator and update this information
annually, if necessary.
B. The voter registration drive coordinator shall coordinate the distribution and
collection of voter registration applications issued by the Secretary of State and shall
deliver completed voter registration applications to the appropriate town clerk in the
municipality in which the registered voter resides or mail or deliver completed voter
registration applications to the Secretary of State.
C. The voter registration drive coordinator shall deliver or mail the completed voter
registration applications within 5 days of the conclusion of the school voter registration
drive and before the close of business on the 21st day before election day in accordance
with Title 21-A, section 121-A.
2. Timing; student eligibility. Secondary school voter education and registration
activities may take place during social studies class periods, homeroom periods or
assemblies. A student must be 16 years of age or older to participate in a school voter
registration drive.
3. Voter registration applications; availability. Voter registration applications for
eligible students must be made available in both online and paper registration formats.
Prior to and following a voter registration drive, a secondary school shall keep voter
registration applications and information about voter eligibility in a location easily
accessible to students.
4. Voter eligibility information. A voter registration drive organized in accordance
with this section must have information about voter eligibility available to students at the
time of the voter registration drive.